District of Columbia statutes.
2-1909

Interpreter in full view.

Whenever an interpreter is required to be appointed to assist a hearing-impaired person under this chapter, the appointing authority shall not commence proceedings until the appointed interpreter is in full view of and spatially situated so as to assure effective communication with the hearing-impaired person or persons involved as participants.

History

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 10, 34 DCR 7426

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2709.